public/third-party/apertium-translations/apertium-spa.spa.metadix
<pardef n="ac/ertar__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ertaríamos</l><r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertaría</l>   <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertaríais</l> <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertarías</l>  <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertarían</l>  <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertaría</l>   <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertaremos</l> <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertaré</l>    <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertaréis</l>  <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertarás</l>   <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertarán</l>   <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertará</l>    <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ertáremos</l> <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ertare</l>    <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ertareis</l>  <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ertares</l>   <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ertaren</l>   <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ertare</l>    <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertando</l>   <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertándo</l>   <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantándo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertamos</l>   <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erté</l>      <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertasteis</l> <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertaste</l>   <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertaron</l>   <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertó</l>      <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertemos</l>   <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertémo</l>    <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantémo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertémos</l>   <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantémos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertad</l>     <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erta</l>      <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertad</l>     <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><!-- S__cantad' was replaced --><par n="S__haz"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertá</l>      <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantá"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertád</l>     <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><!-- S__cantád' was replaced --><par n="S__ház"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierta</l>     <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iérta</l>     <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cánta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierten</l>    <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iérten</l>    <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantándo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierte</l>     <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iérte</l>     <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantándo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertar</l>     <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertar</l>     <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantar"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertár</l>     <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantár"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertábamos</l> <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertaba</l>    <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertabais</l>  <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertabas</l>   <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertaban</l>   <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertaba</l>    <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertáramos</l> <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ertásemos</l> <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertara</l>    <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ertase</l>    <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertarais</l>  <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ertaseis</l>  <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertaras</l>   <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ertases</l>   <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertaran</l>   <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ertasen</l>   <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertara</l>    <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ertase</l>    <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertadas</l>   <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertada</l>    <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertados</l>   <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertado</l>    <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertamos</l>   <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierto</l>     <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertáis</l>    <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iertas</l>    <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iertan</l>    <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierta</l>     <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertemo</l>    <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierte</l>     <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ertéis</l>    <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iertes</l>    <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierten</l>    <r>ertar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="acertar">         <i>ac</i><par n="ac/ertar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="concertar">       <i>conc</i><par n="ac/ertar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="desacertar" a="prompsit2adn"><i>desac</i><par n="ac/ertar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="desconcertar">    <i>desconc</i><par n="ac/ertar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="despertar">       <i>desp</i><par n="ac/ertar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="despertar la curiosidad"><i>desp</i><par n="ac/ertar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>la<b/>curiosidad</l><r><g><b/>la<b/>curiosidad</g></r></p></e>
